dev/ortho/lat-cyr.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%{ˈ%}
%{й%}
%{☭%}

LEXICON Root

:%{ˈ%} Alpha ;
Punct ;
!Exceptions ;
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop

:%{ˈ%} Alpha ;
!Punct ;
 # ;

LEXICON Alpha

a:a AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
A:a AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
b:b AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
B:b AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ç:ç AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ç:ç AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
d:d AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
D:d AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
e:e AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
E:e AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ä:ä AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ä:ä AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
f:f AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
F:f AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
g:g AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
G:g AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
h:h AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
H:h AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
i:i AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
I:i AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
j:j AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
J:j AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ž:ž AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ž:ž AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
k:k AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
K:k AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
l:l AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
L:l AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
m:m AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
M:m AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
n:n AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
N:n AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ñ:ñ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ñ:ñ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
o:o AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
O:o AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ö:ö AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ö:ö AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
p:p AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
P:p AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
r:r AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
R:r AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
s:s AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
S:s AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ş:ş AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ş:ş AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
t:t AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
T:t AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
u:u AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
U:u AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ü:ü AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ü:ü AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
w:w AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
W:w AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
y:y AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Y:y AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ý:ý AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ý:ý AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
z:z AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Z:z AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;



LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ;
%-:%- # ;
%,:%, # ;
!%,:%، # ;  ! Arabic comma
!،:، # ;
!,:، # ;
%;:%; # ;
%::%: # ;
%!:%! # ;
%?:%? # ;
%“:%“ # ;
%”:%” # ;
%«:%« # ;
%»:%» # ;
%(:%( # ;
%):%) # ;
%–:%– # ;
